Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-116
Cherry.

The county of Cherry is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-five, north, of range twenty-five, west, of the sixth principal meridian; thence west to the southwest corner of township twenty-five, north, of range forty; thence north on the east line of Sheridan County to the northern boundary line of the State of Nebraska; thence east along said boundary line to the range line between ranges twenty-four and twenty-five; thence south on said range line to the point of beginning.

Laws 1883, c. 32, § 1, p. 199;

R.S.1913, § 829;

C.S.1922, § 731;

C.S.1929, § 25-118;

R.S.1943, § 22-116;

Laws 1947, c. 59, § 1, p. 194.